Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 2 Control of Pesticides
2-7-63.
Powers of Commissioner generally; rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized, after due notice and an opportunity for a hearing:

To declare as a pest any form of plant or animal life (other than man and other than bacteria, viruses, and other microorganisms on or in living man or other living animals) which is injurious to health or the environment;

To determine whether pesticides registered under the authority of Section 24(c) of FIFRA are highly toxic to man. The regulations promulgated by the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 25(c)(2) of FIFRA, as issued or as hereafter amended, shall govern the Commissioner’s determinations; and

To determine pesticides and quantities of substances contained in pesticides registered for special local needs which are injurious to the environment. The Commissioner shall be guided by Environmental Protection Agency regulations in this determination.

The Commissioner is authorized, after due notice and a public hearing as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” to make appropriate regulations, where such regulations are necessary for the enforcement and administration of this article, including but not limited to regulations providing for:

The collection, examination, and reporting of samples of pesticides or devices pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 2-7-69;

The safe handling, transportation, storage, display, distribution, and disposal of pesticides and their containers;

Labeling requirements for all pesticides required to be registered under this article, provided that such regulations shall not impose any requirements for federally registered labels in addition to or different from those required pursuant to FIFRA;

The specification of classes of devices which shall be subject to paragraph (1) of Code Section 2-7-53;

The determination of which pesticides with restricted uses may be distributed only by licensed restricted use pesticide dealers;

The requirement that any pesticide registered for special local needs should be colored or discolored, if he determines that such requirement is feasible and is necessary for the protection of health and the environment. Such regulations shall be consistent with regulations promulgated by the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 25(c)(5) of FIFRA; and

The establishment of standards for the packages, containers, and wrappings of pesticides registered for special local needs. Such regulations shall be consistent with the regulations promulgated by the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 25(c)(3) of FIFRA.

For the purpose of uniformity of requirements between the states and the federal government, the Commissioner, after a public hearing, may adopt regulations in conformity with the primary pesticide standards, particularly as to labeling, registration requirements, and issuance of experimental use permits, established by the Environmental Protection Agency or other federal or state agencies.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 390, § 5; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 10.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “Section” was substituted for “section” in two places in paragraph (a)(2) and in paragraphs (b)(6) and (b)(7).

U.S. Code.

Section 24(c) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, referred to in paragraph (a)(2) of this Code section, is codified at

7 U.S.C. § 136

v(c).

Section 25(c)(2) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, referred to in paragraph (a)(2) of this Code section, is codified at

7 U.S.C. § 136

w(c)(2).

Section 25(c)(5) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, referred to in paragraph (b)(6) of this Code section, is codified at

7 U.S.C. § 136

w(c)(5).

Section 25(c)(3) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, referred to in paragraph (b)(7) of this Code section, is codified at

7 U.S.C. § 136

w(c)(5).

2-7-64.
Delegation of duties.

All authority vested in the Commissioner by virtue of this article may be executed with like force and effect by such employees of the Department of Agriculture as the Commissioner may designate from time to time for such purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 390, § 12; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 21.

2-7-65.
Cooperation with federal and state agencies; grants-in-aid.

The Commissioner may cooperate, receive grants-in-aid, and enter into cooperative agreements with any agency of the federal government, of this state or its subdivisions, or of another state for the following purposes, without exclusion:

To secure uniformity of regulations;

To enter into cooperative agreements with the Environmental Protection Agency to register pesticides under the authority of this article and FIFRA;

To cooperate in the enforcement of the federal pesticide control laws through the use of state or federal personnel and facilities or any combination thereof and to implement cooperative enforcement programs including, but not limited to, the registration and inspection of establishments;

To enter into a contract for monitoring pesticides for the national plan; and

To prepare and submit state plans to meet federal certification standards or for issuing experimental use permits.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 390, § 13; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 22.

2-7-66.
[Reserved] Disposition of funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 23; repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-4.1, effective May 12, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-4.1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective May 12, 2010.

2-7-67.
Publication of information.

The Commissioner may publish, in such form as he deems proper, results of analyses based on official samples as compared with the analyses guaranteed and information concerning the distribution of pesticides, provided that individual distribution information shall not be a public record.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 19.

2-7-68.
Designation of trade secrets by applicant; protection from public disclosure; notification of proposed release; declaratory judgment.

In submitting data required by this article, the applicant may:

Clearly mark any portions thereof which in his opinion are trade secrets or commercial or financial information; and

Submit such marked material separately from other material required to be submitted under this article.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the Commissioner shall not make public any information which in his judgment contains or relates to trade secrets or any commercial or financial information obtained from a person and considered privileged or confidential, provided that when necessary to carry out this article, information relating to formulas of products acquired by authorization of this article may be revealed to any state or federal agency consulted or as required by law and may be revealed at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued by the Commissioner.

If the Commissioner proposes to release for inspection any information which the applicant or registrant has indicated that he believes is protected from disclosure under subsection (b) of this Code section, he shall notify the applicant or registrant, in writing, by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery. The Commissioner shall not thereafter make such data available for inspection until 30 days after receipt of the notice by the applicant or registrant. During this period, the applicant or registrant may institute an action in an appropriate court for a declaratory judgment as to whether such information is subject to protection under subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 20; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

2-7-69.
Sampling and inspections authorized; notice of contemplated proceedings; search warrants; duty of enforcement; injunctions; written warnings authorized for minor violations.

Sampling and examination of pesticides or devices shall be made under the direction of the Commissioner for the purpose of determining whether they comply with the requirements of this article. The Commissioner is authorized, upon presentation of proper identification, to enter any distributor’s premises, including any vehicle of transport, at all reasonable times, in order to have access to inspect and sample labeled pesticides or devices packaged for distribution. If it appears upon inspection or examination that a pesticide or device fails to comply with this article or regulations adopted hereunder and the Commissioner contemplates instituting criminal proceedings against any person, the Commissioner shall cause appropriate notice to be given to such person. Any person so notified shall be given an opportunity, within a reasonable time, to present his views, either orally or in writing, with regard to the contemplated proceedings. If thereafter, in the opinion of the Commissioner, it appears that this article or regulations adopted hereunder have been violated by such person, the Commissioner shall refer a copy of the results of the analysis or the examination of such pesticide or device to the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

Should the Commissioner be denied access to any land where such access was sought for the purposes set forth in this article, he may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to such land for such purposes. The court, upon such application, may issue the search warrant for the purposes requested.

The Commissioner is charged with the duty of enforcing the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder.

In addition to any other remedy provided in this article, the Commissioner is authorized to bring an action to enjoin a violation of any provision of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated hereunder. In such an action it shall not be necessary for the Commissioner to allege or prove the absence of an adequate remedy at law.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring the Commissioner to report minor violations of this article for prosecution or for the institution of condemnation proceedings, when he believes that the public interest will be served best by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 390, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 11; Ga. L. 1980, p. 747, §§ 1, 2.

2-7-70.
Stop sale, use, or removal order.

When the Commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that a pesticide or device is being distributed, stored, transported, or used in violation of any of the provisions of this article or of any of the prescribed regulations under this article, he may issue and serve a written stop sale, use, or removal order upon the owner or custodian of any such pesticide or device. If the owner or custodian is not available for service of the order upon him, the Commissioner may attach the order to the pesticide or device and notify the owner or custodian and the registrant. The pesticide or device shall not be sold, used, or removed until this article has been complied with and until the pesticide or device has been released in writing under conditions specified by the Commissioner or until the violation has been otherwise disposed of as provided in this article by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 390, § 10; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 12.

2-7-71.
Judicial actions after stop sale, use, or removal order generally; injunctions; condemnation; disposition of condemned pesticide or device; costs and expenses.

After service of a stop sale, use, or removal order is made upon any person, either that person, the registrant, or the Commissioner may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction in the appropriate county for an adjudication of the alleged violation. The court in such action may issue temporary or permanent injunctions, mandatory or restraining, and such intermediate orders as it deems necessary or advisable. The court may order condemnation of any pesticide or device which does not meet the requirements of this article or regulations adopted hereunder.

If the pesticide or device is condemned, after entry of decree it shall be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court directs; and if such pesticide or device is sold, the proceeds, less costs, including legal costs, shall be retained pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1, provided that the pesticide or device shall not be sold contrary to this article or regulations adopted hereunder. Upon payment of costs and execution and delivery of a good and sufficient bond conditioned that the pesticide or device shall not be disposed of unlawfully, the court may direct that the pesticide or device be delivered to the owner thereof for relabeling, reprocessing, removal from the state, or otherwise bringing the product into compliance.

When a decree of condemnation is entered against a pesticide or device, court costs, fees, storage, and other proper expenses shall be awarded against the person, if any, appearing as claimant of the pesticide.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 390, § 11; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 13; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-4.2/HB 1055.

2-7-72.
Effect of article on certain other laws.

No provision of this article shall authorize any person to violate any law or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder, the administration and enforcement of which are assigned to the Department of Natural Resources or any division thereof or to the Coastal Marshlands Protection Committee. This article shall not be construed as repealing, preempting, modifying, or limiting the authority or functions assigned to the Department of Natural Resources or its divisions or officials or to the Coastal Marshlands Protection Committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 24.

2-7-73.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or of the regulations adopted hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 390, § 8; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 18.